Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 42 Osteoporosis Prevention and Treatment Education

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 enactment of this chapter, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 234 (1995).

31-42-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Osteoporosis Prevention and Treatment Education Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-42-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 841, § 2.

Cross references.

Bone mass measurement coverage, T. 31, C. 15A.

31-42-2.
Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are, to the extent funds are available:

To create a multigenerational, state-wide program to promote awareness and knowledge about osteoporosis, risk factors, prevention, detection, and treatment options;

To facilitate understanding of osteoporosis with educational materials, information about research, services, and strategies for prevention and treatment;

To utilize educational and training resources of organizations with expertise and knowledge of osteoporosis;

To evaluate the quality and accessibility of osteoporosis services of community based services;

To provide easy access to clear, complete, and accurate osteoporosis information and referral services;

To educate and train service providers, health professionals, and physicians; and to heighten awareness about the prevention, detection, and treatment of osteoporosis among health and human service officials, health educators, and policy makers; and

To promote the development of support groups for osteoporosis patients and their families and caregivers.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-42-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 841, § 2.

31-42-3.
Strategies to promote and maintain education program.

The department shall establish strategies to promote and maintain an osteoporosis prevention and treatment education program in order to raise public awareness, educate consumers, and train health professionals, teachers, and human service providers, including:

Public awareness. The department shall develop strategies for raising public awareness of the causes and nature of osteoporosis, personal risk factors, value of prevention and early detection, and options for diagnosis and treatment;

Consumer education. The department shall develop strategies for educating consumers about risk factors, diet and exercise, diagnostic procedures and their indications for use, risks and benefits of drug therapies currently approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, and the availability of services;

Professional education. The department may develop strategies for educating physicians and health professionals and training service providers on osteoporosis prevention, diagnosis, and treatment, including guidelines for detecting and treating in special populations, and medication options;

Needs assessment. The department may conduct a needs assessment to identify research being conducted; technical assistance and educational materials and programs nationwide; the level of awareness about osteoporosis; the needs of patients, families, and caregivers; the needs of health care providers, including managed care organizations; the services available to patients; existence of treatment programs; existence of rehabilitation services; and number and location of bone density testing equipment. To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated, the department shall develop and maintain a resource guide to include osteoporosis related services; and

Technical assistance. The department may replicate and use successful osteoporosis programs and contracts with and purchase materials or services from organizations with expertise and knowledge of osteoporosis.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-42-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 841, § 2.